csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_VV.yaml
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: webinigewanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: webinigenigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: webinigewaagwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: webinigenigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: webinigegwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: webinigewaangen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: webinigewangen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: webinigewiingen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: webinigesiiwaanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: webinigesiiwegwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: webinigesiiwanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: webinigesiinigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: webinigesiiwaagwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: webinigesiinigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: webinigesiigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: webinigesiiwaangen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: webinigesiiwangen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: webinigesiiwiingen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: webinigewaambaanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: webinigewegibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: webinigewambanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: webinigenigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: webinigewaagobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: webinigenigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: webinigegobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: webinigewaangibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: webinigewangibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: webinigewiingibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: webinigesiiwaambaanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: webinigesiiwegibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: webinigesiiwambanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: webinigesiinigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: webinigesiiwaagobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: webinigesiinigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: webinigesiigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: webinigesiiwaangibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: webinigesiiwangibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: webinigesiiwiingibanen
